North Carolina statutes. Chapter 140. State Art Museum; Symphony and Art Societies.
Article 1A. Art Museum Building Commission. [Repealed]

§ 140-5.2.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1973, c. 476, s. 43.

§§ 140-5.3 through 140-5.6.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1028, s. 16.

§§ 140-5.7 through 140-5.11.

Reserved for future codification purposes.